Hawaii statutes.
[§634-2] Joint contractual obligations.
In an action on a contract on which two or more persons are jointly, jointly
and severally, or severally liable, the court in which the action is pending
has jurisdiction to proceed against such of the obligors as can be served as if
they were the only obligors. [CC 1859, §1105; RL 1925, §2363; RL 1935, §4047;
RL 1945, §10039; RL 1955, §230-9; HRS §634-33; am L 1972, c 89, §2A(b); ren HRS
§634-2]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rules 19, 20; DCRCP rule 20. Service, see HRCP rule
4; DCRCP rule 4.

Case Notes

Action cannot be maintained against one only of several joint
contractors. 1 H. 71 (1852).

Waiver will cure misjoinder, failure to take advantages of
defense. 2 H. 184 (1859).

In ejectment several defendants claiming separate interests
in land are proper parties defendant. 5 H. 434 (1885); 18 H. 494 (1907).

Joint contractors should be joined in suit. 7 H. 563 (1889).

Judgment is joint though the obligation may be joint and
several. 9 H. 306 (1893), criticized, 20 H. 138, 141 (1910).

Assignor of lease need not be a party to a bill in specific
performance of covenant to renew. 9 H. 597 (1895).

Failure to join necessary parties may subject pleading to
demurrer or motion. 10 H. 340 (1896).

Nonjoinder of one of the joint makers of a note cured by the
verdict. 10 H. 540 (1896).

Suit against joint makers of promissory note must be either
joint or several. 10 H. 540 (1896).

Service on all defendants unnecessary when all are joined as
parties. 12 H. 344 (1900).

All parties to a joint and several contract must be joined,
and in actions on judgment, all judgment debtors must be joined or excuse shown
for not doing so. 13 H. 339, 361 (1901).

Principal debtor need not be joined with grantors as defendants.
13 H. 690 (1901).

Does not apply to joint trustees in a statutory action at law
to quiet title. 15 H. 401 (1904).

Persons named as joint debtors in a contract not signed by
them cannot be joined in an action on the contract. 16 H. 332 (1904).

County need not be joined in a tax action though it receives
half the taxes. 17 H. 146 (1905).

Parties need not be joined in action by one surety against
co-sureties for contribution. 22 H. 540, 546 (1915).

In tort action the liability of a co-defendant is several as
well as joint and several. 24 H. 579 (1918), modified on other grounds, 24 H.
597 (1919).

Service of assignment of errors on one of several joint
defendants is constructive service on the rest. 24 H. 774, 776 (1919).

In tort may join defendants when they concur in negligent
action. 25 H. 508 (1920).

Wife in action on promissory note against a partnership of
which husband is a member need not join husband. 27 H. 369 (1923).

No joinder of plaintiffs in a contract by one party with 103
others each of whom has a separate contract. 29 H. 122 (1926).

Partnership pleading. 33 H. 567 (1935).

May not join defendants in the alternative. 40 H. 86 (1953).

Referred to: 3 H. 695, 696 (1876).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next